District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.36

Rules.

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this part. The rules issued pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the Council within 30 days of February 13, 2002, for a 45-day period of Council review (excluding days of Council recess). If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules by resolution within the 45-day review period, the rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IIIA, § 336
as added Feb. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-69, § 2(b), 48 DCR 11072

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see section 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-6, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2479).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-191, November 29, 2001, 48 DCR 11233).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of Public Disclosure of Findings and Information in Cases of Child Fatality or Near Fatality Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-286, February 25, 2002, 49 DCR 2317).